California statutes. Commercial Code
(C) Proceed, in any sequence, as to part of the personal property or fixtures as provided in subparagraph (A), and as to other of the personal property or fixtures as provided in subparagraph (B).

(2) (A) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3), provisions and limitations of any law respecting real property and obligations secured by an interest in real property or an estate therein,
 including, but not limited to, Section 726 of the Code of Civil Procedure, provisions regarding acceleration or reinstatement of obligations secured by an interest in real property or an estate therein, prohibitions against deficiency judgments, limitations on deficiency judgments based on the value of the collateral, limitations on the right to proceed as to collateral, and requirements that a creditor resort either first or at all to its security, do not in any way apply to either (i) any personal property or fixtures other than personal property or fixtures as to which the secured party has proceeded or is proceeding under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), or (ii) the obligation.

(B) Pursuant to, but without limiting subparagraph (A), in the event that an obligation secured by personal property or fixtures would otherwise become unenforceable by reason of Section 726 of the Code of Civil Procedure or any requirement that a creditor resort
 first to its security, then, notwithstanding that section or any similar requirement, the obligation shall nevertheless remain enforceable to the full extent necessary to permit a secured party to proceed against personal property or fixtures securing the obligation in accordance with the secured party’s rights and remedies as permitted under this chapter.

(3) (A) Paragraph (2) does not limit the application of Section 580b of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(B) If the secured party commences an action, as defined in Section 22 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and the action seeks a monetary judgment on the debt, paragraph (2) does not prevent the assertion by the debtor or an obligor of any right to require the inclusion in the action of any interest in real property or an estate therein securing the debt. If a monetary judgment on the debt is entered in the
 action, paragraph (2) does not prevent the assertion by the debtor or an obligor of the subsequent unenforceability of the encumbrance on any interest in real property or an estate therein securing the debt and not included in the action.

(C) Nothing in paragraph (2) shall be construed to excuse compliance with Section 2924c of the Civil Code as a prerequisite to the sale of real property, but that section has no application to the right of a secured party to proceed as to personal property or fixtures except, and then only to the extent that, the secured party is proceeding as to personal property or fixtures in a unified sale as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(D) Paragraph (2) does not deprive the debtor of the protection of Section 580d of the Code of Civil Procedure against a deficiency judgment following a sale of the real property collateral pursuant to a
 power of sale in a deed of trust or mortgage.

(E) Paragraph (2) shall not affect, nor shall it determine the applicability or inapplicability of, any law respecting real property or obligations secured in whole or in part by real property with respect to a loan or a credit sale made to any individual primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(F) Paragraph (2) does not deprive the debtor or an obligor of the protection of Section 580a of the Code of Civil Procedure following a sale of real property collateral.

(G) If the secured party violates any statute or rule of law that requires a creditor who holds an obligation secured by an interest in real property or an estate therein to resort first to its security before resorting to any property of the debtor that does not secure the obligation, paragraph (2)
 does not prevent the assertion by the debtor or an obligor of any right to require correction of the violation, any right of the secured party to correct the violation, or the assertion by the debtor or an obligor of the subsequent unenforceability of the encumbrance on any interest in real property or an estate therein securing the obligation, or the assertion by the debtor or an obligor of the subsequent unenforceability of the obligation except to the extent that the obligation is preserved by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(4) If the secured party realizes proceeds from the disposition of collateral that is personal property or fixtures, the following provisions shall apply:

(A) The disposition of the collateral, the realization of the proceeds, the application of the proceeds, or any one or more of the foregoing shall not operate to cure any nonmonetary default.

(B) The disposition of the collateral, the realization of the proceeds, the application of the proceeds, or any one or more of the foregoing shall not operate to cure any monetary default (although the application of the proceeds shall, to the extent of those proceeds, satisfy the secured obligation) so as to affect in any way the secured party’s rights and remedies under this chapter with respect to any remaining personal property or fixtures collateral.

(C) All proceeds so realized shall be applied by the secured party to the secured obligation in accordance with the agreement of the parties and applicable law.

(5) An action by the secured party utilizing any available judicial procedure shall in no way be affected by omission of a prayer for a monetary judgment on the debt. Notwithstanding Section 726 of the Code of
 Civil Procedure, any prohibition against splitting causes of action or any other statute or rule of law, a judicial action which neither seeks nor results in a monetary judgment on the debt shall not preclude a subsequent action seeking a monetary judgment on the debt or any other relief.

(6) As used in this subdivision, “monetary judgment on the debt” means a judgment for the recovery from the debtor of all or part of the principal amount of the secured obligation, including, for purposes of this subdivision, contractual interest thereon. “Monetary judgment on the debt” does not include a judgment which provides only for other relief (whether or not that other relief is secured by the collateral), such as one or more forms of nonmonetary relief, and monetary relief ancillary to any of the foregoing, such as attorneys’ fees and costs incurred in seeking the relief.

(7) If a
 secured party fails to comply with the procedures applicable to real property in proceeding as to both real and personal property under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), a purchaser for value of any interest in the real property at judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure proceedings conducted pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) takes that interest free from any claim or interest of another person, or any defect in title, based upon that noncompliance, unless:

(A) The purchaser is the secured party and the failure to comply with this chapter occurred other than in good faith; or

(B) The purchaser is other than the secured party and at the time of sale of the real property at that foreclosure the purchaser had knowledge of the failure to comply with this chapter and that the noncompliance occurred other than in good faith.

Even if
 the purchaser at the foreclosure sale does not take his or her interest free of claims, interests, or title defects based upon that noncompliance with this chapter, a subsequent purchaser for value who acquires an interest in that real property from the purchaser at that foreclosure takes that interest free from any claim or interest of another person, or any defect in title, based upon that noncompliance, unless at the time of acquiring the interest the subsequent purchaser has knowledge of the failure to comply with this chapter and that the noncompliance occurred other than in good faith.

(8) If a secured party proceeds by way of a unified sale under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), then, for purposes of applying Section 580a or subdivision (b) of Section 726 of the Code of Civil Procedure to any such unified sale, the personal property or fixtures included in the unified sale shall be deemed to be included in the “real property or other
 interest sold,” as that term is used in Section 580a or subdivision (b) of Section 726 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9605.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a secured party does not owe a duty based on its status as secured party to either of the following persons:

(1) To a person that is a debtor or obligor, unless the secured party knows all of the following:

(A) That the person is a debtor or obligor.

(B) The identity of the person.

(C) How to communicate with the person.

(2) To a secured party or lienholder that has
 filed a financing statement against a person, unless the secured party knows both of the following:

(A) That the person is a debtor.

(B) The identity of the person.

(b) A secured party owes a duty based on its status as a secured party to a person if, at the time the secured party obtains control of collateral that is a controllable account, controllable electronic record, or controllable payment intangible or at the time the security interest attaches to the collateral, whichever is later, both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person is a debtor or obligor.

(2) The secured
 party knows that the information in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) relating to the person is not provided by the collateral, a record attached to or logically associated with the collateral, or the system in which the collateral is recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 62.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9606.

For purposes of this chapter, a default occurs in connection with an agricultural lien at the time the secured party becomes entitled to enforce the lien in accordance with the statute under which it was created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9607.

(a) If so agreed, and in any event after default, a secured party may do all of the following:

(1) Notify an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral to make payment or otherwise render performance to or for the benefit of the secured party.

(2) Take any proceeds to which the secured party is entitled under Section 9315.

(3) Enforce the obligations of an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral and exercise the rights of the debtor with respect to the obligation of the account debtor or other person obligated on collateral to
 make payment or otherwise render performance to the debtor, and with respect to any property that secures the obligations of the account debtor or other person obligated on the collateral.

(4) If it holds a security interest in a deposit account perfected by control under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9104, apply the balance of the deposit account to the obligation secured by the deposit account.

(5) If it holds a security interest in a deposit account perfected by control under paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 9104, instruct the bank to pay the balance of the deposit account to or for the benefit of the secured party.

(b) If necessary to enable a secured party to exercise under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) the right of a debtor to enforce a mortgage nonjudicially, the secured
 party may record in the office in which a record of the mortgage is recorded both of the following:

(1) A copy of the security agreement that creates or provides for a security interest in the obligation secured by the mortgage.

(2) The secured party’s sworn affidavit in recordable form stating both of the following:

(A) That a default has occurred with respect to the obligation secured by the mortgage.

(B) That the secured party is entitled to enforce the mortgage nonjudicially.

(c) A secured party shall proceed in a commercially reasonable manner if both of the following apply with respect to the secured party:

(1) It
 undertakes to collect from or enforce an obligation of an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral.

(2) It is entitled to charge back uncollected collateral or otherwise to full or limited recourse against the debtor or a secondary obligor.

(d) A secured party may deduct from the collections made pursuant to subdivision (c) reasonable expenses of collection and enforcement, including reasonable attorney’s fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party.

(e) This section does not determine whether an account debtor, bank, or other person obligated on collateral owes a duty to a secured party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 22.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9608.

(a) If a security interest or agricultural lien secures payment or performance of an obligation, the following rules apply:

(1) A secured party shall apply or pay over for application the cash proceeds of collection or enforcement under Section 9607 in the following order to:

(A) The reasonable expenses of collection and enforcement and, to the extent provided for by agreement and not prohibited by law, reasonable attorney’s fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party.

(B) The satisfaction of obligations secured by the
 security interest or agricultural lien under which the collection or
 enforcement is made.

(C) The satisfaction of obligations secured by any subordinate security interest in or other lien on the collateral subject to the security interest or agricultural lien under which the collection or enforcement is made if the secured party receives a signed demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is completed.

(2) If requested by a secured party, a holder of a subordinate security interest or other lien shall furnish reasonable proof of the interest or lien within a reasonable time. Unless the holder complies, the secured party need not comply with the holder’s demand under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1).

(3) A secured party need not apply or pay over for
 application noncash proceeds of collection and enforcement under Section 9607 unless the failure to do so would be commercially unreasonable. A secured party that applies or pays over for application noncash proceeds shall do so in a commercially reasonable manner.

(4) A secured party shall account to and pay a debtor for any surplus, and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of Section 9626, the obligor is liable for any deficiency.

(b) If the underlying transaction is a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes, the debtor is not entitled to any surplus, and the obligor is not liable for any deficiency. Subdivision (b) of Section 701.040 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to the payment of proceeds applies only if the
 security agreement provides that the debtor is entitled to any surplus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 63.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9609.

(a) After default, a secured party may do both of the following:

(1) Take possession of the collateral.

(2) Without removal, render equipment unusable and dispose of collateral on a debtor’s premises under Section 9610.

(b) A secured party may proceed under subdivision (a) in either of the following ways:

(1) Pursuant to judicial process.

(2) Without judicial process, if it proceeds without breach of the peace.

(c) If so agreed, and in any event after default, a secured party may require the debtor to assemble the collateral and make it available to the secured party at a place to be designated by the secured party which is reasonably convenient to both parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9610.

(a) After default, a secured party may sell, lease, license, or otherwise dispose of any or all of the collateral in its present condition or following any commercially reasonable preparation or processing.

(b) Every aspect of a disposition of collateral, including the method, manner, time, place, and other terms, must be commercially reasonable. If commercially reasonable, a secured party may dispose of collateral by public or private proceedings, by one
 or more contracts, as a unit or in parcels, and at any time and place and on any terms.

(c) A secured party may purchase collateral at either of the following:

(1) At a public disposition.

(2) At a private disposition only if the collateral is of a kind that is customarily sold on a recognized market or the subject of widely distributed standard price quotations.

(d) A contract for sale, lease, license, or other disposition includes the warranties relating to title, possession, quiet enjoyment, and the like which by operation of law accompany a voluntary disposition of property of the kind subject to the contract.

(e) A secured party may disclaim or modify warranties under subdivision (d)
 in either of the following ways:

(1) In a manner that would be effective to disclaim or modify the warranties in a voluntary disposition of property of the kind subject to the contract of disposition.

(2) By communicating to the purchaser a record evidencing the contract for disposition and including an express disclaimer or modification of the warranties.

(f) A record is sufficient to disclaim warranties under subdivision (e) if it indicates “There is no warranty relating to title, possession, quiet enjoyment, or the like in this disposition” or uses words of similar import.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9611.

(a) In this section, “notification date” means the earlier of the date on which:

(1) A secured party sends to the debtor and any secondary obligor a signed notification of disposition.

(2) The debtor and any secondary obligor waive the right to notification.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), a secured party that disposes of collateral under Section 9610 shall send to the persons specified in subdivision (c) a reasonable
 signed notification of disposition.

(c) To comply with subdivision (b), the secured party shall send a signed notification of disposition to all of the following persons:

(1) The debtor.

(2) Any secondary obligor.

(3) If the collateral is other than consumer goods to both of the following persons:

(A) Any other person from which the secured party has received, before the notification date, a signed notification of a claim of an interest in the collateral.

(B) Any other secured party or lienholder that, 10 days before the
 notification date, held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral perfected by the filing of a financing statement with respect to which all of the following apply:

(i) It identified the collateral.

(ii) It was indexed under the debtor’s name as of that date.

(iii) It was filed in the office in which to file a financing statement against the debtor covering the collateral as of that date.

(C) Any other secured party that, 10 days before the notification date, held a security interest in the collateral perfected by compliance with a statute, regulation, or treaty described in subdivision (a) of Section 9311.

(d) Subdivision (b) does not apply if the collateral is perishable or threatens to decline speedily in value or is of a type customarily sold on a recognized market.

(e) A secured party complies with the requirement for notification prescribed in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) if it satisfies both of the following conditions:

(1) Not later than 20 days or earlier than 30 days before the notification date, the secured party requests, in a commercially reasonable manner, information concerning financing statements indexed under the debtor’s name in the office indicated in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(2) Before the notification date, the secured party either:

(A) Did not receive a response to the request for information.

(B) Received a response to the request for information and sent a signed notification of disposition to each secured party or other lienholder named in that response whose financing statement covered the collateral.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 64.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9612.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), whether a notification is sent within a reasonable time is a question of fact.

(b) In a transaction other than a consumer transaction, a notification of disposition sent after default and 10 days or more before the earliest time of disposition set forth in the notification is sent within a reasonable time before the disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9613.

(a) Except in a consumer-goods transaction, the following rules apply:

(1) The contents of a notification of disposition are sufficient if the notification does all of the following:

(A) It describes the debtor and the secured party.

(B) It describes the collateral that is the subject of the intended disposition.

(C) It states the method of intended disposition.

(D) It states that the debtor is entitled to an
 accounting of the unpaid indebtedness and states the charge, if any, for an accounting.

(E) It states the time and place of a public disposition or the time after which any other disposition is to be made.

(2) Whether the contents of a notification that lacks any of the information specified in paragraph (1) are nevertheless sufficient is a question of fact.

(3) The contents of a notification providing substantially the information specified in paragraph (1) are sufficient, even if the notification includes either of the following:

(A) Information not specified by that paragraph.

(B) Minor errors that
 are not seriously misleading.

(4) A particular phrasing of the notification is not required.

(5) The following form of notification and the form appearing in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 9614, when completed in accordance with the instructions in subdivision (b) and subdivision (b) or (c), as applicable, of Section 9614, each provides sufficient information:NOTIFICATION OF DISPOSITION OF COLLATERALTo: [Name of debtor, obligor, or other person to which the 
 notification is sent]From: [Name, address, and telephone number of 
 secured party]{1} Name of any debtor that is not an addressee: [Name of each debtor]{2} We will sellthe
 [describe collateral] [to the highest qualified bidder] at public sale. A sale could include a lease or license. The sale will be heldas follows:Date: Time: Place: {3} We will sell (describe collateral) at private sale sometime after [date]. A sale could include a lease or license.{4} You are entitled to an accounting of the unpaid indebtednesssecured by the property that we intend to sell
 or, as applicable, lease or license.{5} If you request an accounting you must pay a charge of (amount) {6} You may requestan accounting by calling us at .[telephone number](b) The
 following instructions apply to the form of notification in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a):

(1) The instructions in this subdivision refer to the numbers in braces before items in the form of notification in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a). Do not include the numbers or braces in the notification. The numbers and braces are used only for the purpose of these instructions.

(2) Include and complete item {1} only if there is a debtor that is not an addressee of the notification and list the name or names.

(3) Include and complete either item {2}, if the notification relates to a public disposition of the collateral, or item {3}, if the notification relates to a private disposition of the collateral. If item {2} is
 included, include the words “to the highest qualified bidder” only if applicable.

(4) Include and complete items {4} and {6}.

(5) Include and complete item {5} only if the sender will charge the recipient for an accounting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 65.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9614.

(a) In a consumer-goods transaction, the following rules apply:

(1) A notification of disposition must provide all of the following information:

(A) The information specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9613.

(B) A description of any liability for a deficiency of the person to which the notification is sent.

(C) A telephone number from which the amount that must be paid to the secured party to redeem the collateral under Section 9623 is
 available.

(D) A telephone number or mailing address from which additional information concerning the disposition and the obligation secured is available.

(2) A particular phrasing of the notification is not required.

(3) The following form of notification, when
 completed in accordance with the instructions in subdivision (b), provides sufficient information:[Name and address of secured party][Date]NOTICE OF OUR PLAN TO SELL PROPERTY [Name and
 address of any obligor who is also a debtor]Subject: [Identification of Transaction]We have your [describe collateral], because you broke promisesin our agreement.{1} We will sell [describe collateral]at public sale. A sale could include a lease or license. The sale will be held as follows:Date: Time: Place: You may attend the sale and bring bidders if you want.{2} We will sell [describe collateral] at private sale sometime after [date].A sale could include a lease or license.{3} The money that we get from the sale, after paying our
 costs,will reduce the amount you owe. If we get less money than youowe, you [will or will not, as applicable] still owe us thedifference. If we get more money than you owe, you will getthe extra money, unless we must pay it to someone else.{4} You can get the property back at any time before we sell it bypaying us the full amount you
 owe, not just the past due payments, including our expenses. To learn the exact amountyou must pay, call us at [telephone number].{5} If you want us to explain to you in[writing] [writing or in [description of electronic record]] [description of electronic record] how we have figuredthe amount that you owe us, {6} call usat [telephone number] [or write us at [secured party’s address]][or contact us by [description of electronic communication method]{7} and request[a written explanation] [a written explanation or an explanation in [description of electronic record]] [an explanation in [description of electronic record]]{8} We will charge you $_____for the explanation if we sent you another written explanation of the amount you owe us within the last six months.]{9} If you need more information about the sale [call usat [telephone number]] [or] [write us at [secured party’s address]] [or contact us by[description of electronic communication method]].{10} We are sending this notice to the following other people who have an interest in [describe collateral] or who owe money
 underyour agreement: [Names of all other debtors and obligors, if any](b) The following instructions apply to the form of notification in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a):

(1) The instructions in this subdivision refer to the numbers in braces before items in the form of notification in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a). Do not include the numbers or braces in the notification. The numbers and braces are used only for the purpose of these instructions.

(2) Include and complete either item {1}, if
 the notification relates to a public disposition of the collateral, or item {2}, if the notification relates to a private disposition of the collateral.

(3) Include and complete items {3} to {7}, inclusive.

(4) In item {5}, include and complete any one of the three alternative methods for the explanation—writing, writing or electronic record, or electronic record.

(5) In item {6}, include the telephone number. In addition, the sender may include and complete either or both of the two additional alternative methods of communication—writing or electronic communication—for the recipient of the notification to communicate with the sender. Neither of the two additional methods of communication is required to be
 included.

(6) In item {7}, include and complete the method or methods for the explanation—writing, writing or electronic record, or electronic record—included in item {5}.

(7) Include and complete item {8} only if a written explanation is included in item {5} as a method for communicating the explanation and the sender will charge the recipient for another written explanation.

(8) In item {9}, include either the telephone number or the address or both the telephone number and the address. In addition, the sender may include and complete the additional method of communication—electronic communication—for the recipient of the notification to communicate with the sender. The additional method of electronic communication is
 not required to be included.

(9) If item {10} does not apply, insert “None” after “agreement:”.

(c) (1) If the collateral is a motor vehicle, a public disposition includes, but is not limited to, the following defined categories:

(A) Retail disposition by a retail seller of motor vehicles who offers the collateral for sale or lease to the general public in the same manner as goods that the seller disposes of on the seller’s own behalf.

(B) Retail disposition made subsequent to advertising in a publication with a recognized ability to attract retail motor vehicle buyers and lessees and in a manner designed to reach the retail buying and
 leasing public for vehicles of that type and condition.

(2) For dispositions under subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1), the secured creditor shall ensure that the consumer has reasonable access to the motor vehicle in question in order to be able to exercise the right to inspect the motor vehicle.

(3) For dispositions under paragraph (1), the following rules apply:

(A) A notification in the form of paragraph (4) is sufficient, even if additional information appears at the end of the form.

(B) A notification in the form of paragraph (4) is sufficient, even if it includes errors in information not required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), unless the
 error is misleading with respect to rights arising under this division.

(C) If a notification under this subdivision is not in the form of paragraph (4), law other than this division determines the effect of including information not required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(4) For dispositions under paragraph (1), the following form of notification, when completed, provides sufficient information:

[Name and address of secured party][Date]NOTICE OF OUR PLAN TO SELL PROPERTY [Name and address of any obligor who is also a debtor]Subject: [Identification of Transaction]We have your [describe collateral], because you broke promisesin our agreement.We will sell (describe type of motor vehicle)beginning on (date)by offering it for retail sale or lease to the general public through(select the applicable provision:)(A) Name of dealerAddress of dealerYou may inspect the motor vehicle and encourage people to purchase or lease it.(or)(B) Advertising it for sale to the general public to be purchasedfrom (name of secured creditor)at (address where vehicle is to be sold)You may inspect the motor vehicle and encourage people to purchase or lease it.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter or disturb any right to inspect a consumer good prior to sale under existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 66.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9615.

(a) A secured party shall apply or pay over for application the cash proceeds of disposition under Section 9610 in the following order to each of the following:

(1) The reasonable expenses of retaking, holding, preparing for disposition, processing, and disposing, and, to the extent provided for by agreement and not prohibited by law, reasonable attorney’s fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party.

(2) The satisfaction of obligations secured by the security interest or agricultural lien under which the disposition is made.

(3) The satisfaction of obligations secured by any subordinate
 security interest in or other subordinate lien on the collateral and to the satisfaction of any subordinate attachment lien or execution lien pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 701.040 of the Code of Civil Procedure if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The secured party receives from the holder of the subordinate security interest or other lien a signed demand for proceeds or notice of the levy of attachment or execution before distribution of the proceeds is completed.

(B) In a case in which a consignor has an interest in the collateral, the subordinate security interest or other lien is senior to the interest of the consignor.

(4) A secured party that is a consignor of the collateral if
 the secured party receives from the consignor a signed demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is completed.

(b) If requested by a secured party, a holder of a subordinate security interest or other lien shall furnish reasonable proof of the interest or lien within a reasonable time. Unless the holder does so, the secured party need not comply with the holder’s demand under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(c) A secured party need not apply or pay over for application noncash proceeds of disposition under Section 9610 unless the failure to do so would be commercially unreasonable. A secured party that applies or pays over for application noncash proceeds shall do so in a commercially reasonable manner.

(d) If the security interest under which a disposition is made secures payment or performance of an obligation, after making the payments and applications required by subdivision (a) and permitted by subdivision (c), both of the following apply:

(1) Unless paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) requires the secured party to apply or pay over cash proceeds to a consignor, the secured party shall account to and pay a debtor for any surplus except as provided in Section 701.040 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) Subject to subdivision (b) of Section 9626, the obligor is liable for any deficiency.

(e) (1) If the underlying transaction is a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory
 notes, both of the following apply:

(A) The debtor is not entitled to any surplus.

(B) The obligor is not liable for any deficiency.

(2) Subdivision (b) of Section 701.040 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to the payment of proceeds and the liability of the secured party applies only if the security agreement provides that the debtor is entitled to any surplus.

(f) The surplus or deficiency following a disposition is calculated based on the amount of proceeds that would have been realized in a disposition complying with this chapter to a transferee other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor if both of the
 following apply:

(1) The transferee in the disposition is the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor.

(2) The amount of proceeds of the disposition is significantly below the range of proceeds that a complying disposition to a person other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor would have brought.

(g) The following rules apply with respect to a secured party that receives cash proceeds of a disposition in good faith and without knowledge that the receipt violates the rights of the holder of a security interest or other lien that is not subordinate to the security interest or agricultural lien under which the disposition is made:

(1) The secured party takes the cash proceeds free of the security interest or other lien.

(2) The secured party is not obligated to apply the proceeds of the disposition to the satisfaction of obligations secured by the security interest or other lien.

(3) The secured party is not obligated to account to or pay the holder of the security interest or other lien for any surplus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 67.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9616.

(a) In this section:

(1) “Explanation” means a record that contains all of the following:

(A) States the amount of the surplus or deficiency.

(B) Provides an explanation in accordance with subdivision (c) of how the secured party calculated the surplus or deficiency.

(C) States, if applicable, that future debits, credits, charges,
 including additional credit service charges or interest, rebates, and expenses may affect the amount of the surplus or deficiency.

(D) Provides a telephone number or mailing address from which additional information concerning the transaction is available.

(2) “Request” means a record that is all of the following:

(A) Signed by a debtor or consumer obligor.

(B) Requesting that the recipient provide an explanation.

(C) Sent after disposition of the collateral under Section 9610.

(b) In a consumer-goods transaction in which the debtor is entitled
 to a surplus or a consumer obligor is liable for a deficiency under Section 9615, the secured party shall do either of the following:

(1) Send an explanation to the debtor or consumer obligor, as applicable, after the disposition and in accordance with both of the following:

(A) Before or when the secured party accounts to the debtor and pays any surplus or first makes demand in a record on the consumer obligor after the disposition for payment of the deficiency.

(B) Within 14 days after receipt of a request.

(2) In the case of a consumer obligor who is liable for a deficiency, within 14 days after receipt of a request, send to the consumer
 obligor a record waiving the secured party’s right to a deficiency.

(c) To comply with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), an explanation must provide the following information in the following order:

(1) The aggregate amount of obligations secured by the security interest under which the disposition was made, and, if the amount reflects a rebate of unearned interest or credit service charge, an indication of that fact, calculated as of a specified date in accordance with either of the following:

(A) If the secured party takes or receives possession of the collateral after default, not more than 35 days before the secured party takes or receives possession.

(B) If the secured party takes or receives possession of the collateral before default or does not take possession of the collateral, not more than 35 days before the disposition.
